Utah statutes.
70D-2-305.   Fee restrictions.

A lender or broker may not accept a fee or deposit from an applicant for a mortgage loan unless at the time the lender or broker accepts the fee or deposit there is a written statement:

(1)  signed by the applicant;

(2)  stating whether or not the fee or deposit is refundable; and

(3)  describing the conditions, if any, under which all or a portion of the fee or deposit will be refunded to the applicant.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 72, 2009 General Session

